Washington statutes.
RCW 41.05.014

Applications, enrollment forms, and eligibility certification documents—Signatures.

(1) The director may require applications, enrollment forms, and eligibility certification documents for benefits that are administered by the authority under this chapter and chapter 70.47 RCW to be signed by the person submitting them. The director may accept electronic signatures.

(2) For the purpose of this section, "electronic signature" means an electronic sound, symbol, or process attached to or logically associated with a record and executed or adopted by a person with the intent to sign the record.

[ 2020 c 57 s 84; 2009 c 201 s 2.]